Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3247.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MINNESOTA INITIATIVE FOUNDATIONS.new text end new text begin $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $1,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund and $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $2,500,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the workforce development fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for grants in equal amounts to each of the Minnesota Initiative Foundations. These appropriations are available until June 30, 2031. The base for this appropriation is $1,000,000 from the general fund in fiscal year 2028 and each year thereafter. The Minnesota Initiative Foundations must use grant money under this section to: new text end new text begin (1) facilitate planning processes for rural communities resulting in a community solution action plan that guides decision making to sustain and increase the supply of quality child care in the region to support economic development; new text end new text begin (2) engage the private sector to invest local resources to support the community solution action plan and ensure quality child care is a vital component of additional regional economic development planning processes; new text end new text begin (3) provide locally based training and technical assistance to rural business owners individually or through a learning cohort. Access to financial and business development assistance must prepare child care businesses for quality engagement and improvement by stabilizing operations, leveraging funding from other sources, and fostering business acumen that allows child care businesses to plan for and afford the cost of providing quality child care; and new text end new text begin (4) recruit child care programs to participate in quality rating and improvement measurement programs. The Minnesota Initiative Foundations must work with local partners to provide low-cost training, professional development opportunities, and continuing education curricula. The Minnesota Initiative Foundations must fund, through local partners, an enhanced level of coaching to rural child care providers to obtain a quality rating through measurement programs. new text end